Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 4. Children in Need of Supervision Act
§ 14-6-429.
Decree where child adjudged in need of supervision; dispositions; terms and conditions; legal custody.

In determining the disposition to be made under this act in regard to any child:

The court shall review the predisposition report, the recommendations, if any, of the multidisciplinary team, the case plan and other reports or evaluations ordered by the court and indicate on the record what materials were considered in reaching the disposition;

If the court does not place the child in accordance with the recommendations of the predisposition report or multidisciplinary team, the court shall enter on the record specific findings of fact relied upon to support its decision to deviate from the recommended disposition;

When a child is adjudged by the court to be in need of supervision the court shall enter its decree to that effect and make a disposition as provided in this section that places the child in the least restrictive environment consistent with what is best suited to the public interest of preserving families, the physical, mental and moral welfare of the child;

When a child is adjudged to be in need of supervision the court shall ensure that reasonable efforts were made by the department of family services to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child’s home or to make it possible for the child to return to the child’s home. Before placing a child outside of the home, the court shall find by clear and convincing evidence that to return the child to the child’s home would not be in the best interest of the child despite efforts that have been made;

The court shall not order an out-of-state placement unless:

Evidence has been presented to the court regarding the costs of the out-of-state placement being ordered together with evidence of the comparative costs of any suitable alternative in-state treatment program or facility, as determined by the department of family services pursuant to W.S. 21-13-315(d)(vii), whether or not placement in the in-state program or facility is currently available;

The court makes an affirmative finding on the record that no placement can be made in a Wyoming institution or in a private residential treatment facility or group home located in Wyoming that can provide adequate treatment or services for the child; and

The court states on the record why no in-state placement is available.

If the child is found to be in need of supervision the court may:

Permit the child to remain in the custody of his parents, guardian or custodian under protective supervision, subject to terms and conditions prescribed by the court;

Transfer temporary legal custody to a relative or other suitable adult the court finds qualified to receive and care for the child, with supervision, subject to terms and conditions prescribed by the court;

Transfer temporary legal custody to a state or local public agency responsible for the care and placement of children in need of supervision, provided:

The child shall not be committed to the Wyoming boys’ school or the Wyoming girls’ school unless the child has attained the age of twelve (12) years and is also found delinquent;

The court may not transfer the temporary legal custody to a state agency for out-of-community placement unless the child or the child’s family has failed to perform under a court supervised consent decree or the department of family services has certified that a community treatment plan has proven unsuccessful.

In cases where a child is ordered removed from the child’s home:

If a child is committed or transferred to an agency or institution under this section:

At least every three (3) months the agency or institution shall recommend to the court if the order should be continued;

Not less than once every six (6) months, the court of jurisdiction shall conduct a formal review to assess and determine the appropriateness of the current placement, the reasonable efforts made to reunify the family, the safety of the child and the permanency plan for the child. During this review:

The department of family services shall present to the court:

If the permanency plan is classified as another planned permanent living arrangement, documentation of the ongoing and unsuccessful efforts to return the child home or place the child for adoption or with a legal guardian or a fit and willing relative for purposes of guardianship or adoption, including evidence of efforts to use social media or other search technology to find biological family members for the child;

Efforts made to ensure that the child is provided, to the greatest extent possible, the opportunity to participate in age appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities and experiences as defined in W.S.

14-13-101

(a)(i) to promote healthy child and adolescent development consistent with W.S.

14-13-101

through

14-13-104

; and

If the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program:

a.

Information to show that ongoing assessment of the child’s strengths and needs continues to support the determination that placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment, consistent with the short-term and long-term goals of the child and the child’s permanency plan;

b.

The specific treatment needs that will be met for the child in the placement;

c.

The length of time the child is expected to remain in the placement;

d.

The efforts made by the department of family services to prepare the child to return home or be placed for adoption or legal guardianship.

If the permanency plan is classified as another planned permanent living arrangement:

a.

Make a judicial determination and explain why, as of the date of the review, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the child; and

b.

Provide reasons why it continues not to be in the best interest of the child to return home or be placed for adoption or with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative for purposes of guardianship or adoption.

Make findings whether the child has been provided, to the greatest extent possible, the opportunity to participate in age appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities and experiences as defined in W.S. 14-13-101(a)(i) to promote healthy child and adolescent development consistent with W.S. 14-13-101 through

14-13-104

.

The court shall:

(1)

Determine whether the permanency plan is in the best interest of the child and whether the department of family services has made reasonable efforts to finalize the plan;

(2)

Order the department of family services to take any additional steps necessary to effectuate the terms of the permanency plan;

(3)

Ask the child or, if the child is not present at the review, the child’s guardian ad litem or other legal representative about the child’s desired permanency outcome;

The court shall order the parents or other legally obligated person to pay a reasonable sum for the support and treatment of the child as required by W.S.

14-6-435

, or shall state on the record the reasons why an order for support was not entered;

In cases where the child is placed in custody of the department, support shall be established by the department through a separate civil action;

Any order regarding potential placement at a psychiatric residential treatment facility shall not specify a particular psychiatric residential treatment facility or level of care for the placement of the child;

If the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program:

Within thirty (30) days of the placement a qualified individual shall conduct an assessment to determine whether the child’s needs can be met through placement with family members or in a foster family home, or if the placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment consistent with the short-term and long-term goals of the child and the child’s permanency plan;

Within sixty (60) days of the placement the court shall:

Consider the assessment completed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

Determine whether the needs of the child can be met through placement in a foster family home or whether the placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment;

Determine whether placement is consistent with the short-term and long-term goals for the child, as specified in the child’s permanency plan;

Approve or disapprove the placement.

As a part of any order of disposition and the terms and conditions thereof, the court may:

Require a child to perform a designated number of hours of community service, or to participate in a work program or to perform labor or services under the supervision of a responsible adult designated by the court and within the limits of applicable laws and regulations governing child labor, to enable the child to meet the obligations imposed pursuant to this act or for the purpose of discipline and rehabilitation when deemed necessary or desirable by the court;

Order the child to be examined or treated by a physician, surgeon, psychiatrist or psychologist or to obtain other specialized treatment, care, counseling or training, and place the child in a hospital or medical facility, youth camp, school or other suitable facility for treatment;

Restrict or restrain the child’s driving privileges for a period of time the court deems appropriate, and if necessary to enforce the restrictions the court may take possession of the child’s driver’s license;

Impose any demands, requirements, limitations, restrictions or restraints on the child, and do all things with regard to the child that his parents might reasonably and lawfully do under similar circumstances;

Order the child, or his parents, or both, to undergo evaluation and indicated treatment or another program designed to address problems which contributed to the adjudication. A parent who willfully violates or neglects or refuses to comply with any order of the court may be found in contempt and punished as provided by W.S.

14-6-438

;

After notice to appear, order the child’s custodial and noncustodial parent or guardian to participate in the child’s treatment or plan of supervision or probation, or otherwise order the performance of any acts which are reasonably necessary to aid the juvenile in completion of court ordered obligations;

Require the child’s parents or guardian to attend a parenting class or other appropriate education or treatment and to pay all or part of the cost of the class, education or treatment in accordance with the court’s determination of their ability to pay;

Require the child’s parents or guardian and the child to participate in a court supervised treatment program qualified under W.S.

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

, provided the court supervised treatment program accepts the child’s parents or guardian and the child for participation in its program.

An institution, organization or agency vested with legal custody of a child by court order shall with court approval, have the right to determine where and with whom the child shall live, provided that placement of the child does not remove him from the state of Wyoming without court authorization. An individual vested with legal custody of a child by court order shall personally exercise custodial rights and responsibilities unless otherwise authorized by the court.

Whenever the court vests legal custody of a child in an institution, organization or agency it shall transmit with the order copies of all clinical reports, social studies and other information pertinent to the care and treatment of the child. The institution, organization or agency receiving legal custody of a child shall provide the court with any information concerning the child that the court may request.

In placing a child in the custody of an individual or a private agency or institution, the court shall give primary consideration to the needs and welfare of the child. Where a choice of equivalent services exists, the court shall, whenever practicable, select a person or an agency or institution governed by persons of the same religion as that of the parents of the child. In case of a difference in the religious faith of the parents, then the court shall select the person, agency or institution governed by persons of the religious faith of the child, or if the religious faith of the child is not ascertainable, then of the faith of either parent.

Any disposition order for a child in need of supervision continues in force for not more than one (1) year, as ordered by the court. A hearing shall be held before the expiration of the disposition order to determine the appropriateness of continuing the order including but not limited to whether the child should be returned to the parent’s custody, remain under custody as ordered or have the custody order amended. The court shall enter an appropriate disposition order after each hearing under this subsection.

The clerk of the court granting probation to a youth adjudicated in need of supervision shall send a certified copy of the order to the department of family services if the department has been requested to provide supervision of the probationer.

At the time of granting probation or at any later time, the court may request the department of family services to provide supervision of the probationer. The supervising probation officer shall not be required to supervise or report on a youth granted probation unless requested to do so by the court granting probation.

A department of state government vested with temporary legal custody of a child by court order under this section has authority to place the child in a residential facility or other out-of-home placement of similar or less restrictive confinement provided:

At least ten (10) days prior to the change in placement written notice of the proposed placement is served upon the child, the child’s parents, the child’s representative, the current placement provider and the office of the district attorney of original jurisdiction, personally or by certified mail to the recipient’s last known address; and

None of the parties within ten (10) days after notice is filed with the juvenile court having jurisdiction, makes a written objection to the proposed change in placement.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 12, § 2.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1999, ch. 6, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2009, ch. 145, § 2; 2011, ch. 12, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 95, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2020 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(i), substituted “review” for “place on the record,” and added “the case plan and other reports or evaluations ordered by the court and indicate on the record what materials were considered in reaching the disposition,” and in (a)(iii) deleted “and in accord with the actual facilities presently available when the decree is entered”; and in (c)(i)(B) substituted “six (6) months” for “twelve (12) months,” and deleted the former last sentence providing an exemption for placement at the state hospital, in (c)(ii) deleted “on its own motion, or on the motion of the person, agency or institution vested with custody or to whom compensation is due,” and added (c)(iii).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d)(viii).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (m), deleted “Absent a specific provision in the placement order requiring prior court approval for any change in placement” at the beginning; and repealed former (n), pertaining to a conflicting provision of legal custody.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (c)(iv).

The 2016 amendment

, in (c)(i)(B), added “During this review” at the end of the present introductory language, and added (c)(i)(B)(I) and
(c)(i)(B)(II).

Laws 2016, ch. 95, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (c)(i)(B)(I)(3) and (c)(v); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 245, § 3, appropriates $1,000,000 from the general fund to the department of health beginning July 1, 2005, to provide funding for the implementation of best practices prevention and intervention services including parenting skills, life skills and indicated therapeutic interventions for the children and families of those individuals receiving treatment or addiction to methamphetamine and other controlled substances.

Laws 2005, ch. 245, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2005.

§ 14-6-430.
Orders of protection; requirements.

On application of any party to the proceedings or on its own motion the court may make an order of protection in support of the decree and order of disposition, restraining or otherwise controlling the conduct of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian or any party to the proceeding whom the court finds to be encouraging, causing or contributing to the acts or conditions which bring the child within the provisions of this act.

The order of protection may require the person against whom it is directed to do or to refrain from doing any acts required or forbidden by law and necessary for the welfare of the child and the enforcement of the order of disposition, including the following requirements to:

Perform any legal obligation of support;

Not make contact with the child or his place of abode;

Refrain from conduct which in any way interferes with or disrupts the control and supervision of the child by his legal custodian;

Permit a parent reasonable visitation privileges under specified conditions and terms;

Give proper attention to care of the home and to refrain from conduct detrimental to the child and the home environment;

Enforce the child’s compliance with the terms and conditions imposed upon him by the order of disposition.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-431.
Duration of orders of disposition; termination of orders.

An order of disposition shall remain in force for an indefinite period until terminated by the court whenever it appears the purpose of the order has been achieved and it is in the child’s best interest that he be discharged from further court jurisdiction.

Unless sooner terminated by court order, all orders issued under this act shall terminate with respect to a child adjudicated in need of supervision when he reaches eighteen (18) years of age. If the child is still in the custody of the department upon attaining the age of eighteen (18) years, services may be provided on a case by case basis.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, any placement of a child in need of supervision shall be reviewed by the court within six (6) months of the date of placement to determine if the placement is appropriate.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2014 ch. 63, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), substituted “eighteen (18) years” for “seventeen (17) years” in two places.

Laws 2014, ch. 63, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

Authority exceeded. —

Order that the juvenile remain in the custody of the Department of Family Services and on probation until he turned 18 was improper the plain statutory language required that all Child in Need of Supervision (CHINS) orders terminate when an adjudicated child reached 17; thus, the juvenile court therefore did not have the authority to issue a CHINS order that imposed conditions beyond the juvenile's 17th birthday. MF v. State, 2013 WY 104, 308 P.3d 854,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2013).

§ 14-6-432.
Appeal; right generally; transcript provided; cost thereof.

Any party including the state may appeal any final order, judgment or decree of the juvenile court to the supreme court within the time and in the manner provided by the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Upon motion of the child or his parents, guardian or custodian, supported by affidavit stating they are financially unable to purchase a transcript of the proceeding, a transcript or so much thereof necessary to support the appeal shall be provided at no cost or at a cost the court determines they are able to pay. Any cost of the transcript not charged to the appellant shall be certified by the court to the county treasurer and paid from the funds of the county in which the proceedings were held.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 14-6-433.
Stay of orders pending appeal; securing of payment; staying transfer of legal custody.

If an appeal is taken, an order to pay a fine, costs, support for a child, restitution or any order for the payment of money may be stayed by the juvenile court or by the supreme court pending appeal. The court may require the appellant to deposit with the clerk of court the whole or any part of the payment ordered, to give bond for the payment thereof or any other terms and conditions to secure payment upon final determination of the appeal as the court deems proper. The court may also issue any appropriate order to restrain the appellant from dissipating his assets pending appeal.

Either the juvenile court or the supreme court may stay an order transferring legal custody of a child to a person, agency, organization or institution other than his parents, guardian or former custodian, provided that suitable provision is made for the shelter care of the child pending the appeal.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 14-6-434.
Fees, costs and expenses.

There is no fee for filing a petition under this act nor shall any state, county or local law enforcement officer charge a fee for service of process under this act. Witness fees, juror fees and travel expenses in the amounts allowable by law may be paid to persons other than the parties who are subpoenaed or required to appear at any hearing pursuant to this act.

The following costs and expenses, when approved and certified by the court to the county treasurer, shall be a charge upon the funds of the county where the proceedings are held and shall be paid by the board of county commissioners of that county:

Witness fees and travel expense;

Jury fees, costs and travel expense;

Costs of service of process or notice by certified mail;

Costs of any physical or mental examinations or treatment ordered by the court;

Reasonable compensation for services and costs of counsel appointed by the court;

Reasonable compensation for services and costs of a guardian ad litem appointed by the court, unless the county participates in the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem; and

Any other costs of the proceedings which would be assessable as costs in the district court.

In every case in which a guardian ad litem has been appointed to represent the child under this act or in which counsel has been appointed under this act to represent a child or the child’s parents, guardian or custodian, the court shall determine whether the child, the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or other person responsible for the child’s support is able to pay part or all of the costs of representation and shall enter specific findings on the record. If the court determines that any of the parties is able to pay any amount as reimbursement for costs of representation, the court shall order reimbursement or shall state on the record the reasons why reimbursement was not ordered. The court may also in any case order that all or any part of the costs and expenses enumerated in paragraphs (b)(i), (iii), (iv) and (vii) of this section, be reimbursed to the county by the child, the child’s parents or any person legally obligated for his support, or any of them jointly and severally, upon terms the court may direct. An order for reimbursement of costs made pursuant to this subsection may be enforced as provided in W.S.

14-6-435

. Any reimbursement ordered for guardian ad litem services provided pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

shall be apportioned between the county and the guardian ad litem program in accordance with payments made for those services.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3.

The 2012 amendment,

in (b)(vi), inserted “unless the county participates in the guardian ad litem program pursuant to W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

and the program was appointed to provide the guardian ad litem”; and in (c), added the last sentence.

Laws 2012, ch. 76 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

Electronic monitoring services. —

The statute does not require that a county government pay for electronic monitoring services. In the Interest of NG, 14 P.3d 203,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 14-6-435.
Ordering payment for support and treatment of child; how paid; enforcement.

When legal custody of a child, other than temporary guardianship, is vested by court order in an individual, agency, institution or organization other than the child’s parents, the court shall in the same or any subsequent proceeding inquire into the financial condition of the child’s parents or any other person who may be legally obligated to support the child. After due notice and hearing the court shall order the parents or any other legally obligated person to pay a reasonable sum for the support and treatment of the child during the time that a dispositional order is in force. The requirements of W.S.

20-2-101

through

20-2-406

apply to this section. The amount of support shall be determined in accordance with the presumptive child support established by W.S.

20-2-304

. In any case where the court has deviated from the presumptive child support, the reasons therefor shall be specifically set forth in the order. The amount ordered to be paid shall be paid to the clerk of the juvenile court for transmission to the person, institution or agency having legal custody of the child or to whom compensation is due. The clerk of court is authorized to receive periodic payments payable in the name or for the benefit of the child, including but not limited to social security, veteran’s administration benefits or insurance annuities, and apply the payments as the court directs. An order for support under this subsection shall include a statement of the addresses and social security numbers if known, of each obligor, the names and addresses of each obligor’s employer and the names and birth dates of each child to whom the order relates. The court shall order each obligor to notify the clerk of court in writing within fifteen (15) days of any change in address or employment. If any person who is legally obligated to support the child does not have full time employment, the court may require that person to seek full time employment and may require community service work in lieu of payment until full time employment is obtained.

An order for the payment of money entered against a parent or other person legally obligated to support a child under the provisions of W.S.

14-6-434

,

20-2-101

through

20-2-406

or this section shall be entered separately from the decree of disposition under W.S.

14-6-429

and shall not be treated as a part of the confidential court record under W.S.

14-6-437

. The order may be filed in the district court of any county in the state. From the time of filing, the order shall have the same effect as a judgment or decree of the district court in a civil action and may be enforced by the district attorney, or the department of family services in the same manner and with the same powers as in other child support cases under W.S.

20-2-303

,

20-2-304

,

20-2-307

,

20-2-311

,

20-2-401

through

20-2-406

and

20-6-101

through

20-6-222

, or in any manner provided by law for enforcement of a civil judgment for money.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2000, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 34, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 70, § 2; 2018 ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “ W.S.

20-2-303

,

20-2-304

,

20-2-307

” for “ W.S.

20-2-303

through

20-2-305

,

20-2-307

.”

§ 14-6-436.
Proceedings deemed in equity.

All proceedings under this act shall be regarded as proceedings in equity and the court shall have and exercise equitable jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-437.
Records and reports confidential; inspection.

Throughout proceedings pursuant to this act the court shall safeguard the records from disclosure. Upon completion of the proceedings, whether or not there is an adjudication, the court shall order the entire file, except for child support orders, and record of the proceeding sealed and the court shall not release these records except to the extent necessary to meet the following inquiries:

From another court of law;

From an agency preparing a presentence report for another court;

From a party to the proceeding;

From the department of family services for purposes of establishing, modifying or enforcing a support obligation.

Upon receipt of inquiries as set out in this section, the court may release a copy of the presentence investigation report together with a cover letter stating the disposition of the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2000, ch. 1, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-438.
Liability for contempt; penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court upon its own motion or upon the motion of the district or county attorney, or guardian ad litem, may find that the child, the child’s parent, parents, or guardian or any other person who willfully violates, or neglects or refuses to obey or perform any order or provision of this act is liable for contempt of court and may be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or incarcerated not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-439.
Separate docket for juvenile cases; availability of records for statistics.

The clerk of the court shall maintain a separate docket for cases under this act and record therein the case number, the allegations of the petition, the age of the child involved and the disposition made. The records shall be made available for statistical purposes provided the names of the parties are not revealed.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-6-440.
Expungement of records in juvenile court.

Any person adjudicated in need of supervision under the provisions of this act may petition the court for the expungement of his record in the juvenile court upon reaching the age of majority. If after investigation the court finds that the petitioner has not been convicted of a felony since adjudication, that no proceeding involving a felony is pending or being instituted against the petitioner and the rehabilitation of the petitioner has been attained to the satisfaction of the court or the prosecuting attorney, it shall order expunged all records in any format including electronic records in the custody of the court or any agency or official, pertaining to the petitioner’s case. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named in the order. Upon entry of an order the proceedings in the petitioner’s case are deemed never to have occurred and the petitioner may reply accordingly upon any inquiry in the matter. Expungement pursuant to this section shall be accomplished as provided in W.S.

14-6-241

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 72, § 1; 2019 ch. 29, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, inserted “in any format including electronic records” following “expunged all records” and added the last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-6-402(a)(xxi).